Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 1. Local Organizations and Ferry System Employees.

Sec. 23.40.010.
Union contracts with state and political subdivisions. [Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 23.40.020.
Enforcement of certain contracts only if union registers.

A labor contract executed in this state by a labor organization that has no local in this state or which contract is not to be executed by one or more of its locals in this state may not be enforced in the courts of this state unless the labor organization has registered with the department and complied with all regulations adopted by it.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.40.030.
Definition of labor organization.

For the purpose of AS

23.40.020

—

23.40.040

“labor organization” includes an organization constituted wholly or partly to bargain collectively or deal with employers, including the state and its political subdivisions, concerning grievances, terms, or conditions of employment or other mutual aid or protection in connection with employees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1959; am § 32 ch 53 SLA 1973)

Sec. 23.40.040.
Collective bargaining agreement.

The commissioner of transportation and public facilities or an authorized representative, in accordance with AS

23.40.020

—

23.40.030

, may negotiate and enter into collective bargaining agreements concerning wages, hours, working conditions, and other employment benefits with the employees of the division of marine transportation engaged in operating the state ferry system as masters or members of the crews of vessels or their bargaining agent.
A collective bargaining agreement is not final without the concurrence of the commissioner of transportation and public facilities.
The commissioner of transportation and public facilities may make provision in the collective bargaining agreement for the settlement of labor disputes by arbitration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 93 SLA 1962; am E.O. No. 39, § 11 (1977))

Secs. 23.40.045 — 23.40.060.
Records; local labor organizations; interference in chartering prohibited; civil enforcement; exemptions; penalties.
[Repealed, § 55 ch 69 SLA 1970.]